src/morphology/stems/numerals.lexc
LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND              		!^C^
 M:M 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;					!
 MM:MM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;					!
 MMM:MMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;				!
 MMMM:MMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;				!
 MMMMM:MMMMM 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG ;				!

LEXICON 2ROM-THOUSAND-TAG				!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;							!
 : 2ROM-HUNDRED ;							!

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED					!^C^
 C:C 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 CC:CC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 CCC:CCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 CD:CD 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 D:D 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 DC:DC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 DCC:DCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!
 DCCC:DCCC 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;				!
 CM:CM 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG ;					!

LEXICON 2ROM-HUNDRED-TAG				!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;							!
 : 2ROM-TEN ;								!

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN						!^C^
 X:X 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 XX:XX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 XXX:XXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 XL:XL 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 L:L 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 LX:LX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 LXX:LXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!
 LXXX:LXXX 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;					!
 XC:XC 2ROM-TEN-TAG ;						!

LEXICON 2ROM-TEN-TAG					!^C^
 : ROMNUMTAG ;							!
 : 2ROM-ONE ;								!

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE						!^C^
 I:I 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 II:II 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 III:III 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 IV:IV 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 V:V 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 VI:VI 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 VII:VII 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!
 VIII:VIII 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;					!
 IX:IX 2ROM-ONE-TAG ;						!

LEXICON 2ROM-ONE-TAG
 ROMNUMTAG ;
 
LEXICON ROMNUMTAG
 +Num+Rom+: # ;


! A final section with some isolated numeral expresssions !
! ------------------------------------------------------- !

      
LEXICON ISOLATED-NUMEXP					!^C^
 ½+Num:½ # ;						!
 ¹+Num:¹ # ;						!
 ²+Num:² # ;						!
 ³+Num:³ # ;						!
 ¼+Num:¼ # ;						!
